Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7611
Termination; liability.

Any participating employer that voluntarily terminates its participation in the multiple employer welfare arrangement or that is involuntarily terminated by the multiple employer welfare arrangement shall remain liable subsequent to the date of termination for all contractual obligations it has entered into with the multiple employer welfare arrangement on or before the date of termination.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 11.